Tennessee statutes. Title 12 Public Property, Printing And Contracts
Chapter 11

Interstate Contracting for Federal Programs Act

12-11-101. Short title — Purpose.

This chapter may be cited as the “Interstate Contracting for Federal Programs Act.”

The purpose of this chapter is to allow the state to join with other states in contracting to provide necessary materials and services for federal-state programs, in order to provide effective use of combined resources to prevent duplication and unnecessary expense to the citizens of this state.

Acts 1997, ch. 283, § 1.

12-11-102. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Contractor” means a governmental entity, corporation, partnership, natural person, or joint venture which is qualified to provide materials and services for use in federal-state programs;

“Federal government authorization” means approval in writing, whether in the form of statute, regulation, bulletin, manual, or letter signed by an authorized person, approving certain activities under a federal-state program;

“Joint federal-state program” means any program authorized by the statutes and/or regulations of the United States and the state of Tennessee where both governments supervise, authorize, and/or fund a program to provide money, goods, or assistance to residents of the state of Tennessee. A program may be a joint federal-state program even if one (1) government is solely responsible for funding or operating the program;

“State” means a state of the United States;

“State of Tennessee” includes all agencies of the state of Tennessee listed in title 4, chapter 3; and

“United States” means the federal government of the United States or any federal agency as defined under federal law.

Acts 1997, ch. 283, § 1.

12-11-103. Contracts for joint federal-state programs.

The state of Tennessee may enter into joint contractual arrangements with other states and/or the United States to obtain materials and services to carry out the purposes of a federal-state program.

The state of Tennessee may enter into agreements with another state and/or the United States to purchase materials and services to carry out the purposes of a federal-state program. This agreement may be part of a series of the agreements whereas one (1) state or the United States has agreed to serve as a “lead state” and purchase materials and/or services from one (1) or more contractors, and resell these materials and services to the state of Tennessee and other states.

The state of Tennessee may serve as a “lead state” and thus agree to purchase materials and/or services from one (1) or more contractors, and resell some of these materials and services to one (1) or more other states.

No contract authorized under subsections (a)-(c) may be signed unless the contract is for goods and services necessary for a federal-state program, the procurement is legally acceptable under the laws of the federal government and those of all participating states, and unless the procurement has received federal government authorization.

The contracts authorized under subsections (a)-(c) may be entered into with one (1) or more states or the United States and one (1) or more contractors as defined in § 12-11-102.

Any contract authorized by this section may be negotiated and entered into without regard to the requirements for competitive bidding of chapter 3 of this title and the requirements of former § 12-4-109 [See the Compiler’s Notes]. Such exemptions must be approved in writing by the commissioner of the agency of the state of Tennessee authorized to manage the joint federal-state program, the commissioner of finance and administration and the comptroller of the treasury.

Acts 1997, ch. 283, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §12-4-109, referred to in this section, was recodified by Acts 2013, ch, 403, effective July 1, 2013. Provisions similar to former §12-4-109 were transferred to other sections within title 12, ch. 3, parts 1 and 3.

12-11-104. Negotiations for joint federal-state program contracts.

The state of Tennessee may join with other states and/or the United States in evaluating responses to invitations for proposals for contracts to supply materials or services for joint federal-state programs. The state of Tennessee, subject to the approval of the attorney general and reporter, may negotiate agreements with other states concerning the joint procurement efforts.

The state will have the right to terminate negotiations or contracts pursuant to this chapter at any time in its sole discretion. The state's right to terminate will be regardless of whether the procurement effort has been approved by any federal court or agency or if other states or federal agencies determine to continue with a joint procurement program.

All contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter are contingent on the receipt of necessary appropriations from the general assembly and the federal government, and shall be terminated if such funding becomes unavailable.

Acts 1997, ch. 283, § 1.